Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-558
Water; contract; security for payment.

The board may enter into contracts for water service with persons, mutual ditch companies, water users' associations and other private corporations for irrigation or commercial use as shall be provided by contracts in writing authorized and entered into by the board; and the board shall require that security be given to secure the payments to be made under such contract or contracts.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 24, p. 549.